Illinois, session 104th, SB2731.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Hospital Act is 5amended by adding Section 15 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 330/15 new)7    Sec. 15. Compliance with the Health Care Sanctity and 8Privacy Law. The University of Illinois Hospital shall comply 9with Section 6.14h of the Hospital Licensing Act. 10    Section 10. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 11adding Section 6.14h as follows: 12    (210 ILCS 85/6.14h new)13    Sec. 6.14h. The Health Care Sanctity and Privacy Law.14    (a) This Section may be referred to as the Health Care 15Sanctity and Privacy Law. 16    (b) As used in this Section: 17    "Administrative volunteer" means an individual who serves 18as a volunteer at a hospital in only an administrative 19capacity. 20    "Law enforcement agent" means an agent, subcontractor, or 21designee of a federal, State, or local law enforcement agency   SB2731- 2 -LRB104 16071 RPS 29349 b1with the power to arrest or detain individuals, to manage the 2custody of detained individuals, or to issue a subpoena for a 3law enforcement purpose, including, but not limited to, civil 4immigration enforcement.5    "Patient" means any person who has received or is 6receiving medical care, treatment, or services from an 7individual or institution licensed to provide medical care or 8treatment in this State. 9    (c) Each general acute care hospital shall adopt and 10implement a policy regarding interactions with law enforcement 11agents by January 1, 2026, and all other hospitals shall adopt 12and implement a policy regarding interactions with law 13enforcement agents by March 1, 2026. Each policy adopted under 14this subsection must include, at a minimum:15        (1) The designation of a contact person or persons to 16    be notified of all law enforcement presence or information 17    requests at the hospital and procedures to respond to 18    those requests. The designated contact person or persons 19    shall be legal counsel of the hospital or other 20    individuals within the administration of the hospital.21        (2) Procedures to verify the identity and authority of 22    any law enforcement agent involved in civil immigration 23    activities at the hospital site, including, but not 24    limited to, the use of best efforts to request and 25    document the first and last name of the law enforcement 26    agent, the name of the law enforcement agency, and the   SB2731- 3 -LRB104 16071 RPS 29349 b1    badge number of any law enforcement agent presenting with 2    a patient or requesting information about a patient.3        (3) Procedures for designating space for law 4    enforcement agents to remain and wait at a hospital, 5    considering public interest, staff safety, and patient 6    needs; provided, however, that a law enforcement agent may 7    access such areas of the hospital as the hospital's 8    designated contact person approves if the law enforcement 9    agent: (i) complies with hospital policy and State and 10    federal law, including, but not limited to, that the law 11    enforcement agent has a valid judicial warrant or court 12    order signed by a judge or magistrate to accompany a 13    patient in the law enforcement agent's custody or 14    otherwise be present in the facility or (ii) is requested 15    by hospital staff to respond to a safety or security issue 16    within the hospital.17        (4) Procedures to ensure that patients are provided 18    with:19            (A) a notice of privacy policies in accordance 20        with 45 CFR 164.520, including information about the 21        patient's right to request an amendment to the 22        patient's medical record, which shall be made 23        available in the languages of the populations of 24        persons living within the geographic area served by 25        the hospital in compliance with the Language 26        Assistance Services Act and which may include a   SB2731- 4 -LRB104 16071 RPS 29349 b1        request that any of the following information be 2        deleted, redacted, or amended:3                (i) place of birth;4                (ii) immigration or citizenship status; or5                (iii) information from birth certificates, 6            passports, permanent resident cards, alien 7            registration cards, or employment authorization 8            documents; and9            (B) an opportunity, at the earliest reasonable 10        moment, to sign an authorization form in order to 11        permit the disclosure of information by the hospital 12        to parents, guardians, relatives, or other designees 13        of the patient about the patient's health status or 14        hospital admission and discharge, which shall also be 15        made available in languages of the populations of 16        persons living within the geographic area served by 17        the hospital in compliance with the Language 18        Assistance Services Act.19        (5) Procedures to ensure that any protected health 20    information requested by a law enforcement agent is 21    released only in strict accordance with all applicable 22    local, State, and federal law, including, but not limited 23    to, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 24    Act of 1996, as amended, and its implementing regulations, 25    including, but not limited to, the Privacy Rule (45 CFR 26    Parts 160, 162, and 164) and, including, but not limited   SB2731- 5 -LRB104 16071 RPS 29349 b1    to, 45 CFR 164.512(e) and (f).2        (6) In the case of a law enforcement agent seeking 3    information for the purpose of immigration enforcement, to 4    the extent not in conflict with 45 CFR 164.512(e) and (f), 5    a procedure to release information only when the following 6    circumstances are met, and in strict compliance with:7            (A) a valid and accurate subpoena issued by a 8        federal judge or magistrate;9            (B) a valid and accurate order issued by a federal 10        judge or magistrate to require access; or11            (C) a valid and accurate warrant issued by a 12        federal judge or magistrate.13        (7) Procedures to ensure annual and, as deemed 14    reasonably necessary by the hospital, episodic training on 15    such policy to:16            (A) all hospital clinical health care staff, 17        including, but not limited to, intake staff, emergency 18        room staff, and independent contractors who provide 19        clinical services;20            (B) security personnel;21            (C) designated contact persons; and22            (D) administrative volunteers.23        (8) Procedures to ensure all policies of the hospital 24    comply with this Section.25        (9) A requirement that a hospital or its agents shall 26    not retaliate against a patient, employee, or agent who   SB2731- 6 -LRB104 16071 RPS 29349 b1    files a complaint under this Section.2    (d) The policies required by subsection (c) shall be 3submitted to the Department. General acute care hospitals 4shall submit the policies to the Department no later than 5January 1, 2026, and all other hospitals shall submit the 6policies to the Department no later than March 1, 2026.7    (e) Hospitals shall post, either by physical or electronic 8means, in a conspicuous place within the hospital, which is 9accessible to patients, employees, and visitors, a 10description, provided by the Department, regarding the phone 11number that individuals can call to learn about their 12immigration rights. Notices under this Section shall be posted 13in the predominant language or languages spoken in the 14hospital's service area. 15    (f) By January 15, 2026, the Department shall notify any 16general acute care hospital that has failed to provide a copy 17of the policy required under this Section, and by March 15, 182026, the Department shall notify all other hospitals that 19have failed to provide a copy of the policy required under this 20Section.21    A hospital receiving such a notice shall have 7 working 22days to provide a copy of the policy. The failure of a hospital 23to submit a copy of such a policy within 7 working days may 24subject the hospital to the imposition of a fine by the 25Department. The Department may impose a fine of up to $500 per 26day until the hospital files the policy.   SB2731- 7 -LRB104 16071 RPS 29349 b1    (g) The Department shall have the authority to investigate 2and respond to complaints from patients, employees, and the 3public alleging noncompliance with subsection (c). A hospital 4and its agents shall not retaliate against a patient, 5employee, or agent who files a complaint under this Section. 6    (h) All hospital personnel, including administrative 7volunteers, shall be forever held harmless from any civil, 8criminal, or other liability that may arise, now or in the 9future, as a result of their reasonable compliance with the 10provisions of this Section. 11    (i) Nothing in this Section affects a hospital's 12obligation as a mandated reporter or to otherwise respond to 13instances of suspected crime on the premises.14    (j) This Section is not intended to conflict with federal 15law or stand as an obstacle to the enforcement of federal laws.  16    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 17severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.